Title
Review for Lost Highway (1997)
Number of Reviews
23

Author
Marty Mapes
*** (out of 4) LOST HIGHWAY uses a technique that other films have used
before; namely it starts and ends in the same place. But LOST HIGHWAY is
not a loop; it is a Moebius strip, turning itself inside out before
coming back to the beginning.=20
One part of the story involves a man who kills his wife (Bill Pullman
and Patricia Arquette); the other part of the story involves a young kid
of a mechanic who gets caught up with a powerful mobster and his moll
(Balthazar Getty, Robert Loggia, and Patricia Arquette, again).=20
Much debate has raged over the "plot" of this movie and every critic I
have read so far has dismissed the connection between the stories as
unsolvable. Later in the review I propose a solution to the story, as
suggested by my dear sister.=20
Realizing before I went that I might not "get" the movie, I tried to
keep an open mind while watching it. The first thing that struck me was
that the characters were two dimensional. Pullman's character =97 Fred
Madison =97 lives in an expensive-looking house in what appears to be L.A.
His job? He's an avant-garde saxaphone player. His wife Renee apparently
does not work.=20
Forgive me for being cynical, but a saxophone player cannot make enough
to afford a $300,000 house, let alone support two people, at least not
without selling out. But then he wouldn't be avant-garde, would he?=20
Okay. I can forgive the movie some 2-D characters. In fact, the dry,
crisp 2-D cops were an amusing touch to the movie. I understood that the
movie was not about characters but about mystery. There is one character
who, though he may be 2-D, is very interesting. He is Mystery Man
(Robert Blake) and he is extremely creepy. He has an evil intensity
about him and somehow, he is part of the key to the connection between
the two stories.=20
As I continued to watch I kept noticing how great the cinematography
was. When movies switched from mostly black & white to mostly color, one
of the greatest losses was the richness, depth, and texture of shadows.
Bruce Kawin says in HOW MOVIES WORK, "In color, shadows are in danger of
being washed out or of appearing as patches of muted color." LOST
HIGHWAY has neither problem. Lynch and cinematographer Peter Deming have
taken control of light and created a film with the range of color and
the depth of black & white.=20
A few examples spring to mind. Early in the film, Fred walks away from
the camera down a dark hallway into the bathroom. He eventually
disappears into the blackness of the screen. The shots of the highway at
night make such a good use of black that you can't tell where theater
ends and the screen begins. When the cops are searching the Madison
home, the orange walls show not muted tones of color, but clearly
defined shadows.=20
As withCRASH, the story doesn't make a lot of sense by itself and some
examination of the tone and emotion is required to appreciate what is
happening. The tone of LOST HIGHWAY is set, not with music, like CRASH,
but with the visual elements of colors, textures, and shadows. The tone
of LOST HIGHWAY is mysterious, vaguely ominous, and frightening by means
of the unknown.=20
Without much in the way of a story, I still recommend this movie for its
tone and its look. And if you like a good mystery, see the movie and try
to piece it all together. I felt it wasn't worth the effort to try to
put it together when nobody has come up with an "answer."=20
Having said that, let me present my sister's interpretation of the
"plot." If you think she's got something here, or if you know why she
can't be right, please email me your comments. I'll publish any
responses I get on my page (http://net.indra.com/~mmapes). Here's the
the theory of how the story works in a literal chronology.=20
The literal story starts when Renee/Alice (she's the same person) is
forced to strip for Mr. Eddy at gunpoint. She realizes she likes it and
gets sucked into the world of pornography and violence. Notice that she
and Mr. Eddy are making out at a party, watching a "death porn" film.=20
She is later introduced to Pete (the young mechanic), whom she seduces,
uses, and kills. She kills him when they both arrive at the burning
beach house with Mystery Man. Mystery Man represents murderousness; he
embodies the ability to commit murder ("I don't go where I'm not
invited").=20
Alice becomes Renee, seduces Fred, and marries him. She says the same
line to him that she said to Pete (something about getting a job; "just
a job" at a certain club). Fred looks into this (though not on screen)
and learns that his wife is not only a porn star, but that she is a
monster who uses men, seduces them, and kills them. In a way, Fred is a
victim, just like his Moebius-strip counterpart Pete. But Fred catches
on to her game and sets out to murder his monster of a wife (he meets
the Mystery Man at the party; he is ready to commit murder). He carries
out his deed and is sentenced to death.=20
At the end of the movie (not the timeline) Fred speaks in the intercom
TO RENEE that Dick Laurent is dead. He's really saying: "I'm on to you;
I know what you are and I have put a stop to it."=20
I can think of one unanswered question if this is the "solution"; when
did he kill his wife, relative to when he killed Mr. Eddie/Dick Laurent?
Still, this could be a small detail in the larger picture. Also, other
stylistic elements must be discarded as red herrings, but I think she's
on to something here.=20
Check out more current movie reviews at
http://www.indra.com/~mmapes

Author
Edward Johnson-Ott
Lost Highway (1997)
Bill Pullman, Patricia Arquette, Balthazar Getty, Robert Blake, Natasha 
Gregson Wagner, Richard Pryor, Lisa Boyle, Michael Massee, Jack Nance, 
Henry Rollins, Gary Busey, Robert Loggia, Marilyn Manson. Directed by 
David Lynch.
Rated R, ** and one half stars (out of *****)
Review by Ed Johnson-Ott
For more reviews, go to www.nuvo-online.com/film
At a party, a mystery man in white-face, with black lips and no eyebrows, 
approaches from across the room. Fred recognizes him from a dream. "We've 
met before, haven't we?" the man says, smiling dangerously. "I don't 
think so," Fred stammers, "Where was it you think we met?" "At your house.
 In fact, I'm there right now." Fred twitches nervously and says "That's 
fucking crazy, man!" Smoothly, the mystery man pulls out a cell phone and 
barks "Call me. Dial your number." Fred calls his home phone number. 
After two rings, he hears it answered. "I told you I was here," says the 
voice of the mystery man over the phone. Astonished, Fred gazes at the 
man standing in front of him and gasps "How'd you do that?" Staring 
intently at the phone in Fred's hand, the man says "Ask me," then laughs 
like a maniac.
Welcome to "Lost Highway," the latest offering from "Blue Velvet" and 
"Twin Peaks" creator David Lynch. This time around, Lynch dispenses with 
any semblance of traditional storytelling, pushing the weird-o-meter off 
the scale in a baffling excursion into horror noir. 
Bill Pullman and Patricia Arquette play Fred and Renee, an edgy couple 
who communicate in a halting, primary school form of dream-speech. Every 
move these two make imparts a sense of dread, a Lynch specialty. Life in 
their orange retro-trendy home goes from creepy to creepier as they find 
a series of videotapes on their doorstep. After a tape reveals that 
someone has filmed the couple while they were sleeping, they call the 
cops. Fred tells the Dragnet boys of his disdain for camcorders, stating 
blandly (and significantly,) "I like to remember things my own way. How I 
remembered them, not necessarily the way they happened."
It's possible the whole film is presented from Fred's tortured point of 
view. Mind you, I'm just guessing here. Anyway, after encountering the 
aforementioned mystery man (played with psychotic gusto by Robert Blake,) 
Fred finds another tape, showing him standing over Renee's dead body. In 
quick fashion, Fred is convicted of murder and locked in a gothic prison 
cell by guard Henry Rollins (whose neck, by the way, is now wider than 
his head.) During a morning cell check, the authorities discover that 
Fred has disappeared, and in his place is Pete (Balthazar Getty,) a dazed 
young auto mechanic who squints a lot. Since Pete isn't Fred, he is 
released from prison by the confused warden. 
Are you still with me? Congratulations. Pete recuperates at home, where 
his parents (Gary Busey and Lucy Butler) watch produce documentaries and 
make cryptic remarks that indicate they might know what happened to their 
son. When he returns to work, psycho-gangster and regular customer Mister 
Eddy (Robert Loggia) shows up with his girlfriend Alice (also played by 
Arquette.) Despite having watched Mister Eddy pistol whip a discourteous 
driver while screaming highway safety statistics, Pete decides to have an 
affair with Alice. This leads to a numbing series of schemes and 
surrealistic images, punctuated by lots of ultra-violence. Eventually, 
just after having sex in the desert night beneath the headlights of a car,
 Pete turns back into Fred, the mystery man pops up repeatedly, and the 
film loops back around in moebius strip fashion.
So, what does it all mean? Well, maybe Fred killed his wife, but couldn't 
cope with the consequences. Trapped in his cell, he falls into a dream 
and imagines he is transformed into another man and freed. In short order,
 though, he becomes involved with another incarnation of the woman he 
murdered, finding that even a psychotic state of mind affords no escape 
from his personal Hell. Or maybe he did change identities, only to be 
pursed by the wrathful spirit of Renee. I'm just guessing here. 
It's also possible that the whole thing is just beautifully photographed 
smoke and mirrors from a gifted director who has painted himself into a 
creative corner. David Lynch has been blending sex, violence, 
doppelgangers, surrealism and deadpan humor for years, upping the outrage 
level with each new work. Maybe this is just where he ended up, on his 
own Lost Highway, performing dazzling, but meaningless cinematic card 
tricks. I honestly don't know whether Lynch's work here is ballsy or 
merely desperate. If you see "Lost Highway" and figure out what going on, 
drop me a line, okay?

Author
Serdar Yegulalp
CAPSULE: Potentially interesting story rendered dull and coldly distant by
David Lynch's perpetually smug and alienating style. There are better ways
to be conned.
Watching LOST HIGHWAY, I kept thinking about a picture puzzle that you spend
a week trying to solve, only to discover half the pieces are missing. I felt
conned; I'd lost two and a half hours of my life over a movie that added up
to exactly nothing. Everything in LOST HIGHWAY cancels itself out.
There are people who have argued this point with me at length, insisting
that was what the movie was about. I disagree, because LOST HIGHWAY doesn't
even bother to enlist our attention long enough to BE about anything. It is
a self-important and boring film that builds in its own excuses for being
and never tells us what they are.
The story actually has an intriguing presence. A jazz musician (Bill
Pullman) and his wife receive a series of videotapes in the mail. Someone is
walking around filming their house. Then the stranger gets bolder and starts
filming the *inside* of the house as well. Eventually, the tapes show
Pullman having murdered his wife -- and sure enough, guess what's happened.
Pullman is sent to prison, but while awaiting execution, he has a series of
bizarre Lynchian experiences in his cell and morphs into someone else
(Balthazar Getty), a young punk. Nobody can explain it, but they have to let
him go. That doesn't mean they can't keep an eye on him, of course.
As I said, all of this is potentially interesting. Not in Lynch's hands.
Everything I described is stretched out to fill the entire first hour of the
movie, which slithers by *so* slowly and lingers on every insignificant
gesture *so* painfully that by the time we get to the change-over, all
interest in the goings-on has been buried. The actors are not bad in their
roles -- they're just made into zombies. I was reminded of the way Robert
Bresson -- the French director with an almost paranoid loathing of actors
attempting to supersede the director's vision -- who made his actors repeat
scenes until they simply did them with mechanical precision and no attempt
at personification. Except that Bresson had a larger vision to communicate.
Lynch has nothing that we can discern, save the urge to be artfully bizarre.
The other day I saw BEGOTTEN, a movie with no dialogue and no real storyline
that succeeded excellently in being enthralling. Why did that work and LOST
HIGHWAY fail? Probably because BEGOTTEN was purer and not beholden to
anything remotely familiar. LOST HIGHWAY is so obviously David Lynch
indulging himself to no good end that we're alienated and fed up in short
order.
David Lynch has made two, possibly three films that I enjoyed: ERASERHEAD,
which was probably the best showcase for his homegrown surreal nightmares;
BLUE VELVET, which actually set up a story in the midst of his pretentions,
and THE ELEPHANT MAN, which made the most sense and was the most human.
Everything since, and no doubt from now on, has proven to be a waste of
time, and to be honest I'm not one to mourn.

Author
Joshua McAdams
        Mere words cannot begin to describe the experience of David
Lynch's "Lost Highway."  To label the film as egotistical ,
nonsensical, and ametuerish would be an insult to films i have
previously considered as bottomfeeders. I would rather face a Brian
Bosworth retrospective than be forced to suffer through this offering
again.
Lynch mistakes begin in the opening credits when he attempts
to blend  some Billy Coriggan imitator croning over a erratic POV shot
speeding down a deserted highway at night. This incredibly blatant
grab for the "alternative" box office totally unmasks Lynch the
"artist" to reveal a director who I can only describe as comiclly
untalented.
More examples of Lynch's overt attempt to be "different"
abound as the story starts to progress. Bill Pullman is a saxaphonist
with a cheating wife who starts finding videotapes on his front stoop
from an anonymous evil entity. See how long it took to describe the
action? Lynch doesn't see it as this straight forward. Instead he
milks every minute detail of the couples' strained relationship,
pausing for endless amounts of dead time and filtering in "errie"
music to manipulate the audience. Granted, soundtracks always toy with
the audiences emotions but "Lost Highway" is so contrived that you
feel used instead of apprehensive. 
Lynch shakes the camera, which some will no doubt laud as
great direction. Lynch puts people wearing black shirts against black
backgrounds, which some people may see as symbolic. But what Lynch
does most of all is waste time and film. "Lost Highway" drags  into a
world of  "surrealism" until it finally begins to twist and constrict
around itself until all the promise and life is choked out of the
film. Why is the publicity surrounding his films always about him?
Three words: lack of story.
To further disguise the plot abyss, Lynch brings in these
graphic sex scenes, six or seven in all, that I suppose could be
justified as central to characters. Instead I found myself asking why
I was looking  at Patricia Arquette's breasts again. Again "Lost
Highway" sets itself in a category that has been reserved for the
absolute worst of the worst. Yes, it breaks new ground and falls
straight into the basement.
Unfortunately there are some individuals who have the right to
enjoy this type of film making. I find them  gathered in art galleries
and coffee shops discussing the meaning of this or the theme of that.
I always attempt to get some type of concrete examples as to why they
feel Lynch is a quality director, but all I tend to get is artiste
doublespeak such as "Lynch explores repressed tensions of the world."
It's a sad statement about our commercial society when something is
considered artistic just because it is different or because someone
(usually the person who does it) tells you how different and artistic
the work is.
As I opened with words cannot describe the pain one must
endure to reach the credits on "Lost Highway."  Manic/Despressives
beware: I'm thankful I left my gun at home or I may have opted for
suicide. I noticed the usher takes you belt and shoestrings as you
enter.

Author
James Pyke
i have little interest in writing a review as such of this film. i firmly 
believe that this film defies traditional "this is what happens and this 
is why i liked it"-style film reviewing. 
i'm not even going to mention any character names or plot events.
instead i would like to suggest that people who have not yet seen LOST
HIGHWAY go see it with the following in mind (and those who have seen it
and disliked or felt baffled by it may want to give it another shot): 
-you will have to stay very focused on the image and sound for the entire
running time. (and don't even think about getting to the theater late).
-on first viewing (you will need to watch it more than once), just try to
relax and let the images flow into your mind without trying to force them
to be "logical" or "linear". as you have no doubt heard, the story is not
straightforward nor is it easily grasped. LOST HIGHWAY is unlike any film
you will have ever seen (except for the few out there who have seen films
by alain robbe-grillet) in terms of its narrative structure (yes, it DOES
have one of these, and a very precise one at that). 
(an analytical/theoretical digression follows, and may be a bit hard to
follow, but i guarantee that i worked it out carefully and tried to word
it all as concisely as possible).
in my opinion, this is lynch's best film ever, period. it is also one of
the best films of at least the past decade. i put it in a class of what i
consider to be "perfect" films which i define as films which have every
cinematic element (from photography to acting to editing to sound to etc.) 
in the exact form necessary to convey the sense or meaning of the film. 
some have accused LOST HIGHWAY of being plotless or indecipherable when,
in fact, it has an extremely complex plot which grows from what is, on its
surface, a very simple "kernel" of story.  
what makes LOST HIGHWAY so great (i mean "great" in the sense of a
monumental cinematic achievement), in the main, is that the method and
structure with which it creates itself is ENTIRELY cinematic. that is to
say that there is no possible way that any other artform (for example a
novel or a play) could convey this story - these ideas - in this way,
with this impact. to provide a counterexample: i think that LONE STAR is
indeed a wonderfully written, directed, and acted film, but it does not
require the medium of film to convey its particular meaning and impact. it
could be done with equal quality as a stage play. in fact many of its
visual storytelling techniques are extremely "stagelike". 
LOST HIGHWAY is wholly filmic. it approaches the medium as a pure means of
externalizing human sensory perception in a more nearly complete manner
than any other art form could. and this is what film is best at doing
among all art forms. music stimulates the hearing, painting stimulates
vision (and at times touch), sculpture stimulates vision and touch (if
they let you touch it, like they ought to), fiction stimulates the
imagination/mind, etc, etc. the unique complexity of film, however, is
that it can fuse nearly every other medium to stimulate every human sense
(okay, only vision and hearing directly, but these are considered by
perceptual scientists to be the "primary" senses and the others can be
stimulated in film by implication or indirect means). LOST HIGHWAY
stimulates the senses in the extreme.
this is why some have compared watching LOST HIGHWAY to a drug trip: it
acts directly on one's perceptions as do hallucinogenic drugs. it forces
the viewer to observe reality from an altered perspective. under the
influence of drugs, however, one's altered perspective is at least one's
own, and so it typically makes some sort of strange sense (even if that
sense may not be wholly apparent to the hallucinator). viewing lost
highway is like experiencing the world not merely through an altered
perspective, but further removes the viewer from his/her own perspective
entirely and places her/him into the perspective of a completely foreign
mind. add to this the fact that this mind belongs to a deeply distressed
individual and the fact that one's own innate perceptions must perforce
effect one's grasp of this foreign perspective and it's little wonder that
the film is a bit difficult to approach.
to attempt such a high degree of play with human perception (all films -
by the nature of their medium - play with perception, but few go to such
an extreme as LOST HIGHWAY) is an absolutely brilliant cinematic project
which can be an equally brilliant success, but only if the viewer is up to
the task of accepting the film on its own terms.
even nick roeg, the last popular master of such experimentation, never
took it this far, nor did it with such precision.

Author
Michael Dequina
David Lynch's reputation as master of the surreal is not in any
danger with the release of his first film in five years, Lost Highway.  In
the new film, Lynch's bizarre, dream-like approach is as fascinating as
ever... and every bit as frustrating as well.  Lynch's gift has always been
his curse, and his latest work is just more evidence supporting that fact.
The "plot" defies traditional explanation, but I'll try anyhow.  The
excellent first act introduces us to married couple Fred and Renee Madison
(Bill Pullman and Patricia Arquette).  Immediately we get the sense that all
is not well here: Fred, a jazz saxophonist, suspects that his pretty
brunette wife could be up to no good whenever he is away performing at a
club.  Things get creepy when the two start finding videotapes anonymously
dropped off on their doorstep each morning.  These tapes begin innocently
enough--an exterior shot of their house--but each successive tape goes
further, entering the house, eventually showing things that should not be
seen by outsiders.  Somehow figuring into this is a white-faced Mystery Man
(Robert Blake), who, in a genuinely spooky moment, confronts Fred at a
party.  This segment of the film is Lynch at his best; with the aid of
cinematographer Peter Deming and master composer Angelo Badalamenti, he ably
creates a chilling atmosphere of dread that gets under the skin.  We know
something bad is bound to happen; we just don't know what.
Needless to say, things do get bad; unfortunately, the bad extends
to the audience.  Lynch's fervid imagination once again gets the better of
him, as the weirdness of plausible situations clears out to make way for the
just plain weird.  Fred is sentenced to Death Row for a brutal crime
depicted on one of the videotapes, and after suffering a series of massive
head pains, he wakes up one morning a new man--literally: 19-year-old
mechanic Pete Dayton (Balthazar Getty), who is promptly released from
prison.  Pete eventually gets sexually entangled with Alice, the sultry
blonde girlfriend of a local gangster/pornographer (Robert Loggia).  The
"clever" twist?  Alice is also played by Arquette.
To describe anything that goes on beyond this stage is pointless,
for at this point it becomes clear that the film, which began so
promisingly, is actually about nothing; all established characters and plots
are virtually irrelevant.  What Lynch and co-scripter Barry Gifford (who
also had a hand in Lynch's horrid mess Wild at Heart) ultimately appear to
be after is an experimental exercise in elliptical dialogue and situations;
in non-linear, circular narrative.  Granted, this _is_ an interesting
experiment; I can't say I was ever bored.  But I just wish there were some
kind of accessible story within this interesting framework, a real plot on
which to hang all the graphic sex and gruesome violence--in short, a point
to all of this.  Say what you will about Lynch's last film, 1992's
much-maligned Twin Peaks--Fire Walk with Me, but at least that film, its
many baffling "Lynchian" touches aside, had a genuine story at its core;
distinct characters and plot can be delineated.  Here, there's a lot to feed
the visceral senses, but nothing else.
Lost Highway, like other Lynch films, does stay with you long after
it's over.  But for once I'd like to know exactly why it does.  In the end,
Lost Highway lives up to its title--a long, winding road that will leave all
travellers lost.
Michael Dequina
mrbrown@ucla.edu  |  mj23@the18thhole.com
Visit Mr. Brown's Movie Site at http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/
Personal Page: http://members.tripod.com/~MrBrown/home.html

Author
Frankie Paiva
Lost Highway, the most recent Lynch opus makes it's way into theaters just two
months after Scream, which markets itself as a scary movie. Compared to this,
it's Care Bear fare. 
Saxaphone player Fred Madison (Pullman) and wife Renee (Arquette) start
receiving videotapes of their house, and of them sleeping in bed. They are set
on the front porch, unmarked, showing more every night. This continues until
they receive a video showing Fred killing his wife, who has mysteriously
disappeared. Fred is put in jail, and much to the guard's surprise the next
morning, someone else has replaced him in his cell. 
Mechanic Pete Dayton (Balthazar Getty) is his replacement, and we get to see
the story of him, how he makes a new friend in mob boss (Robert Loggia) who not
only is linked to a guy that makes porn movies (starring Marilyn Manson in a
cameo.) He introduces him to Alice (Arquette again) who strangely looks like
Renee. 
Sound like a soap opera? Not really...the chilling aspect is eyebrowless Robert
Blake (who sort of has this white clown makeup on) who tells Fred that he is at
his house while he is talking to him at a party. Also, the use of silence is
wonderful and had me jumping even when the TV turned on or the phone rang.
The video features a preview for a video all about David Lynch, and it's my
guess that some of the bizarre strangeness of this movie could find explanation
there. But until we find the key to open Lynch-world this is just a weird
violence-high film noir.
ADDITIONAL NOTE: I have been hearing rumors of a rerelease in February of 2000,
if this is true, I highly advise you to go see this film in theater for an even
more chilling experience. 

Author
Zach Ralston 
Directed by David Lynch
Starring Bill Pullman, Patricia Arquette, Balthazar Getty, Robert Loggia, 
To sleep, perchance to dream. To dream, perchance to kill your wife, rob a
porn star, and blow out the brains of a gangster.  Welcome to the world of
David Lynch, a warped, unpredictable world that has been responsible for as
many good dreams (like the darkly comic romance Wild at Heart) as bad ones
(such as Dune, and the crass, boorish  Blue Velvet,).  
Lynch's latest psychic nightmare Lost Highway, is possibly his most
schizophrenic and dissociative entry, running all over the place faster than
rapid eye movment.  The opening credits are immediately grabbing.  We are
hurled down a dark highway, yellow lines racing by with blurry intensity to
the beat of a throbbing David Bowie dance.  The names of the cast shoot out
at us, and we know that there is something amiss, since these names include
Henry Rollins, Gary Busey, and Richard Pryor.  Lynch has staked his claim to
this film, and however bizarre and incomprehensible it may be, we can't
accuse of it of not being engrossing.  
But along with the enticing mood comes inherent, deliberate confusion.
 Describing the plot would be futile, since no audience member will be able
to figure it out, and I suspect Lynch himself doesn't know what it's about.  
Lost Highway is an exercise in sensual filmmaking, geared for shock and
surprise rather than cerebral connections.  Characters become other
characters, and actors change faces like chameleons change colors.  What
lingers is not a linear narrative, but singular images, with emotions ranging
from fear to sexual desire, and everything in between.  
As expected with an experiment like this, not everything is consistently good
or bad.  Lynch is beyond good and evil, until his films define a context of
their own, and all we can do as viewers is respond with base impulses and
instinctual reactions.  Lost Highway is an antidote to rationality; things
can go just as horribly wrong as they can go ecstatically entertaining.
The story that pretends to be a plot, at least for the first hour, revolves
around Fred Madison (Bill Pullman, whose tusseled locks and nordic features
make him look suspiciously like a watered-down Lynch), a sax player who is
married to the sexy Renee (underplayed seductively by Rosanna Arquette).
 When mysterious videotapes of Fred and Renee's private lives begin appearing
on their doorstep, the wealthy Los Angeles couple call the cops, who offer no
help.  Unfortunately it is this pair of police that arrest Fred a couple days
later for slashing Renee to death, a murder he can't remember committing (and
we can't remember watching).
On death row, Fred inexplicably changes bodies - his soul is transferred to
the youthful car mechanic Pete (Balthazar Getty, unsuccessfully imitating
James Dean), who must be subsequently released from jail, since he couldn't
possibly have murdered Fred's wife.  Pete returns to work for his boss
(Pryor, in a thankless and condescending role), and resumes friendship with
the evil Mr. Eddy (Robert Loggia).  Mr. Eddy's mistress is Alice, a blonde
bombshell, played by -- yes, Rosanna Arquette.  Is Alice the same person as
Renee, or does she just look like her?  Is Pete the same person as Fred, even
though the two look totally different?
Then the story gets really crazy.  Lynch feels content to excuse his
narrative unwinding with the fact that dreams are just as perplexing.  It is
not Lynch's goal to communicate in terms we like to understand; he wants us
to catch a glimpse of his subconscious, a mind that doesn't connect from A to
B.
Early in the film, Fred states that he hates video cameras because, "I want
to remember things the way I remember them. I don't want to reflect the way
things really happened."  This is the closest Lynch comes to telling us
straight out his filmmaking motives.  Realism has no part in his world;
documentary is fiction and fiction is fantasy.
For much of the movie, especially the first half, Lynch's images are
brilliant. He shows a rare talent for personifying the "id," and denying the
superego. Filmically, Lynch is a Freudian anarchist, treating sex and
violence as sensuous desires rather than moral problems.  But when these
psychological gimmicks surface as filler, the film grinds to a halt, as
confusion becomes a hinderance rather than an asset.  It often feels as if
Lynch is being sick for the sake of being sick, hoping that abstract gluttony
masks his lack of substantial ideas.
Lost Highway is if anything, an interesting film.  It doesn't aspire to be
conventional, but it also doesn't apsire to be safely entertaining.  Lynch
admits that his dreams are often scary, funny, twisted, and terrible. And to
see into his mind, we have to endure some of the terrible to get at the
hidden genius.

Author
Kevin Patterson
Lost Highway  * * * 1/2 (out of four)
R, 1997
Directed by David Lynch. Written by Lynch and Barry Gifford.
Starring Bill Pullman, Patricia Arquette, Balthazar Getty.
When I left the theater after seeing David Lynch's "Lost Highway," I remarked
to a fellow movie-goer, "I feel like someone just sucked my brains out through
my nose and put them back in through my ears." In his first feature film in
five years, Lynch delivers a film second only to his debut picture
"Eraserhead" on the weirdness scale. You won't "know" what happened when it's
over, though there are certainly enough clues with which to make some
reasonable guesses.
It is difficult to describe the plot of this film, because it depends partly
on how you interpret it. I can, however, describe what we see on the screen:
L.A. jazz saxophonist Fred Madison (Bill Pullman) and his wife Renee (Patricia
Arquette), whom he clearly suspects of infidelity, receive a series of
videotapes apparently filmed inside their house while they were asleep. They
are, naturally enough, more than a little frightened and confused, and it
doesn't help matters any when "Mystery Man" (Robert Blake) approaches Fred at
a party and proceeds to call himself on the telephone at the Madisons' house
in a scene that is at once hilarious and unnerving. The next morning, Fred
finds another videotape which, to his (and our) surprise, shows him brutally
murdering Renee in their bedroom. He is convicted of her murder and sent to
death row, where he inexplicably disappears one night and is replaced by a
young mechanic named Pete Dayton (Balthazar Getty). The perplexed prison
officials release Dayton, whose life begins to intersect with Fred in a number
of ways - most notably his affair with Alice Wakefield (Arquette again), a
blonde who is otherwise Renee's spitting image, and another encounter with the
Mystery Man. I would be giving away a little too much to reveal any more, but
suffice it to say that Lynch doesn't offer any neat wrapups, nor does he put
a lid on the metaphysical confusion: the cinematic demons of "Lost Highway"
are out in full force from beginning to end. 
This description might make "Lost Highway" sound like a giddy exercise in
haywire surrealism, but in fact, while there are traces of Lynch's weird sense
of humor, this film is anything but giddy most of the time. On the contrary,
Lost Highway  is a dark and perplexing mystery that takes Lynch's previous
excursions into murder and intrigue one step farther. The film does not
revolve around a character investigating a mystery; rather, the character *is*
the mystery. There are recurring and at times deeply disturbing images of
suspicion, distrust, and infidelity thoughout the film that seem to indicate a
deluded, fractured psyche at the root of all the bizarre goings-on here. We,
the audience, are left to puzzle out whose psyche it is that is driving this
(probably Fred's, in my opinion) and what, in that case, the other characters
and events are meant to represent. 
All of this proceeds, appropriately, in Lynch's typically slow-paced,
idiosyncratic style. As is often the case, Lynch relies on sound, imagery, and
mood more than on dialogue and action to tell his story, and in "Lost Highway"
it works perfectly. There are scenes when the camera lingers on Fred's blank
expression as he drifts uncomfortably down a hallway, or on his pained face in
his prison cell while the haunting strains of This Mortal Coil's "Song to the
Siren" can be heard faintly in the background; nothing is technically
"happening" in these scenes, yet they present a vivid picture of a man losing
his grip just as effective as, if not more so than, the hysterical screaming
found in most movie presentations of insanity. Lynch's direction and Director
of Photography Pete Deming's darkly lit cinematography serve to create a
nearly suffocating atmosphere of tension and fear that are exactly what is
needed for this story. 
Well, most of the time, anyway - I have to admit that I was a bit bored at
times during the section of the film with Pete Dayton as the protgaonist,
which is less inherently interesting and mostly keeps the viewer's attention
because of its tie-ins to the original mystery. The   main characters in this
"reality" - Dayton (a well-meaning but none too intelligent 24-year-old), a
sleazy gangster (who for some reason has two names but otherwise is pretty
much a stock character), and his porn-star girlfriend (the blond Arquette) -
are nothing you couldn't find in any of the two dozen "Pulp Fiction" wannabes;
fortunately, the reappearance of the Mystery Man as well as some other
typically Lynchian elements, such as the strained, awkward conversations
between Pete and his parents, help to preserve the film's spooky, unnerving
tone during this stretch. Lynch's typically graphic and disturbing portrayals
of fringe sexuality, while relevant to the themes of jealousy and adultery,
are also somewhat overdone here. It's not exactly exploitative - like almost
everything else in this film, the sex is thoroughly weird and creepy and is
unlikely to provide any cheap lurid thrills - as much as it is unnecessary and
frankly kind of dumb by the seventh or eighth time Arquette takes her clothes off.
That said, these minor flaws don't prevent "Lost Highway" from attaining its
place as one of the darkest, most unsettling films to hit the screens in
recent years. It is a one-way ride down the lost highway of a disturbed mind,
and as such it is gripping, intense, and brilliantly effective. 
Visit my Film Reviews page at:
http://members.aol.com/KTPattersn/reviews.html

Author
Jason Overbeck
David Lynch is a great director, his films include Eraserhead and Blue
Velvet.  Lynch continues to push the limit with Lost Highway, a film
that dares to be different and definatly does.  This is the kind of film
that Lynch fans will eat up and others will be frustated to tears.  This
film doesn't follow the truths of hollywood film and will piss of most
audiences expecting it to.
This film is also a powerful peice of atmosphere and mood setting.  We
get the setup of a troubled couple getting videotapes on their steps
that become unpersonable (a few seconds of their house) to a later tape
with them sleeping.  The first twenty minutes are the best as the mood
of tension and horror are powerful.  Then the movie changes gears to a
plot involving a mob bos's mole (Patricia Arquete), who was also he wife
of the first troubled couple.  Is this the same lady? What is going on
here?
The more the film goes on the more credibility it throws to the wind. 
After a while the film looks like it may never reach a satisfactor
ending - and it doesn't even try.  
The direction is very good, and so is the acting.  The actors are forced
to reach levels of emotions or logical blandness that they handle it
quite well.  It seems like Lynch can direct anyone to give great
performance, remember Hopper's tour de force in Blue Velvet.
It you are not disturbed by the films lack of satisfing normal standards
you may be by certain S&M scenes that are reminiscent of Rossilini in
Blue Velvet.  Instead of Rossilini's forced public nakedness, we have
Arquete being forced to strip by Robert Loggia as the mob guy.  She ends
up with noting but bikini panties and a very humiliated look on her
face.  I wonder if Lynch has something against women.  Does he find
humiliation sexy or is it a way of establishing power.
You may get the answer to that tough question in the film, Pretty as a
Picture: The Art of David Lynch.  In that film we get an inside look at
Lynch, Lynch's relationship to the cast and crew, and a breif interview
with Arquete.  She says that one of the reasons she chose the film was
because she had a huge phobia of nudity, and she thought the nude scenes
in Lost Highway may help her to get over it.  More importantly, in that
film, you will find a look inside Lynch's art.  He loves dark images and
is fascinated by decay and pushing the limit.  I am highly recomeding
Lost Highway because it pushes that limit and I will not befall the same
ambuitity as other critics.  Often critics call for originality and
imagination but when the get something too new and fresh they dismiss
it, I won't!

Author
Omar Odeh

David Lynch's second best film to date is perfect evidence of what
makes him fascinating as a filmmaker; he has always since day one made
the types of films you normally have to earn the right to
make. Filmmakers in the Americain system, capable of comandeering
substantial resources(financial, human, technical etc..)  in support
of their projects have usually had to go through some sort of rite of
passage after which the reigns on creativity are considerably
loosened. John Woo had to wait two films (ignoring the more sinister
implications...). There is no louder testimonial to this fact,
regarding Lynch's cinema, than his first (and best) film,
Eraserhead. Lost Highway is just as brilliant although we are clearly
in different territory at this point.
Generally speaking, Lost Highway is either about a couple's
experiences with a bizarre mental illness or an interconnected telling
of two distinct tales within which certain characters intertwine. It
could also be both. This is not to suggest that a single reading
exists and that it is difficult to decipher; the whole point is that
the film is any and all of these. In effect Lynch has negotiated an
unprecedented relartionship with the spectator of total and complete
complicity as far as reception and meaning-generation are concerned.
A variety of sources (Cahiers, Film Comment, Cineaste etc..) have
commented on the various structures that establish this
relationship. All in some way or another are linked to Lost Highway's
narrative technique. Structurally, Lynch's conception transcends more
conventional circular narratives in that it is ultimately a loop that
invites the viewer to join in at a given point and follow through
until he has reached this origin. It has been suggested that the
film's indeal exhibition of the film would be a continuous loop of the
film. The fact of the matter is that just as form came front iand
center in Greenaway's The Pillow Book, Lynch here buries his story, as
intriguing as it may be, under the two real creative thrusts of the
film: narrative technique itself and the production design. Both are
decidedly eerie...
The collapsing of space between filmmaker and spectator brings with it
such a degree of subjectivity in the viewer that many have ended up
terrified. This terror usually ends up being expressed as anger,
frustration or accusations of self-indulgence on Lynch's
part. Paradoxically. nothing could be further from the truth, in that,
it as an act of heroic bravery, given today's viewing climate in
Ameica to put forward a film that puts so much faith in them.

Author
Jerry Saravia
Bill Pullman plays an impotent saxophone player, Fred Madison, who lives in a posh L.A. house with his beautiful wife, Renee (Patricia Arquette). One day, Renee finds a videocassette on her front doorstep. They both watch the tape. It turns out that someone is videotaping the exterior of their house. They ignore it ('Maybe it's a real-estate video'). They keep receiving more video packages until one reveals Renee's murder! Fred is framed, or is he? He is incarcerated and, through some mysterious circumstances, metamorphoses into a young mechanic named Peter Dayton (Balthazar Getty). What the hell is happening here? Is Fred dreaming he has become someone else, or is he denying and forgetting the evil he has wrought, namely the murder of his wife?                                                                 
These are very minute flaws in Lynch's most enigmatic and most profound film in the history of cinema. You'll leave the theatre in a state of disillusionment saying "what the hell was that all about?" There are no resolutions, no logical connections, no easy answers, and no sense of redemption in Lynch's world (And no real conclusion to boot). Add to that the most bizarre cast since "Twin Peaks": Richard Pryor, Gary Busey, Marilyn Manson (!) and the late Jack Nance (Henry from "Eraserhead"), and you are in for one of the wildest, best films of the nineties. It is his darkest, weirdest, nastiest bit of business ever (Red Alert: the Mystery Man appears to be in two places at once, which mirrors the opening and closing shots of Fred talking to himself through a speaker - a surreal joke about Fred's duality). Lynch has said he likes unsolved puzzles. "Lost Highway" will leave you thinking for days on end as to its meaning. It is the viewer's interpretation that really matters.    !
!
For more reviews, check out JERRY AT THE MOVIES at http://buffs.moviething.com/buffs/faust/
E-mail me with any questions, comments or complaints at jerry@movieluver.com or at Faust667@aol.com

Author
Dave Cowen
This review contains what might be considered spoilers, but I honestly don't 
think that it would spoil the film for anyone.  There's two sides to every 
story.
Like a jazz artist, Lynch takes his head and adds new riffs, playing his pet 
themes with a different tone, or improvising with new ideas.  While with 
certain filmmakers this would indicate a lack of inspiration, with Lynch it 
indicates a desire to explore deeper with certain themes which resonate 
throughout his work.  In order to understand those themes, and the resonance 
that they provide in the context of these films, it's necessary to look back 
at his prior works to shape the meaning of the seemingly inexplicable plots 
Lynch weaves together.  Unfortunately, this hardly means that LOST HIGHWAY is 
Lynch's best or more successful film.  While there are distinct moments of 
brilliance in LOST HIGHWAY, and the very structure of the film allows Lynch 
to explore his primary themes in new ways, there are flaws which make LOST 
HIGHWAY seem mediocre when compared with other films in Lynch's stable.
In TWIN PEAKS, the Little Man From Another Place (Michael Anderson) shouts 
out the word "Doppelganger!" played forward on tape after it had been 
recorded from the actor reciting the word backwards.  The idea of a 
doppelganger, a ghostly double of a living person, is a theme explored in the
prematurely aborted TWIN PEAKS that has carried over into LOST HIGHWAY's 
universe -- and is an idea essential to the understanding of the film.  Lynch 
himself, it would appear, would seem to have a doppelganger: the genuinely 
nightmarish imagery of his films don't seem to have any link with Lynch's own
innocent, genial Eagle-scout republican image.  This separation of the 
nightmarish and the innocent in Lynch's films have led critics to berate 
these films for having a poor sense of morality, or portraying good and evil 
in a literal and simplistic sense.  But that doesn't seem to be the case: most 
of Lynch's characters seem to exhibit both sides of this moral structure, 
having both innocent ideals yet being intimately familiar (or curious) about 
the darker sides of human life -- something that one rarely sees in the 
standard good guy / bad guy structure of the average Hollywood film.  It is 
natural, not just natural but common, in life for a person to be at once 
repulsed by and drawn in by something, or for a person to have a side that 
they consider light, or moral and right, and dark, a more primal, amoral side. 
 Lynch takes this element of human life, often hidden or simplified in both 
life and in art, and makes them accessible through his surreal visions.  On 
the most simple level the doppelganger, in a Lynch film, is a literal 
separation of a character's "light" and "dark" sides.
Nearly everyone in LOST HIGHWAY has a doppelganger.   Fred Madison, played by
a brooding Bill Pullman, is a tenor, a saxophonist who plays free jazz at 
local nightclubs and on the local radio.  His doppelganger is Pete Dayton 
(Balthazar Getty, doing his best Luke Perry), a talented young mechanic who 
seems to spend more time having sex than fixing cars.  Fred lives with Renee 
(Patricia Arquette), a brunette who seems to be straight out of THE BETTY 
PAGES.  Pete meets who appears to be Renee's doppelganger Alice (also 
Arquette), who is a blond sexpot in the same vein.  Both Renee and Alice 
know Andy (Michael Massee) and Mr. Eddy, who is also known as Dick Laurent 
(Robert Loggia), all of whom are involved in the pornography industry.
"Her name is Renee!  If she told you her name was Alice, she's lying," says 
the Mystery Man, played by Robert Blake.  With white facepaint and no 
eyebrows, the Mystery Man appears to be no less than Mephistopheles himself 
(or Bono's Macphisto, perhaps?).  Fred dreams of the Mystery Man's face on 
Renee's body one night... and Renee/Alice and the Mystery Man are often seen 
at the same place, but never in the same shot.  It would seem that Renee's 
doppelganger isn't her blond self, Alice -- when Pete sees a picture of 
Laurent, Renee, Alice and Andy, he asks her which one she is.  "I'm this one," 
she says, scratching her finger over Alice's blond body.  When the police come
 to the scene of a crime later, they look at the picture.  Alice's image isn't 
part of it.  
A true dread creeps through the opening scenes.  Dialogue that is alternately 
cliched and filled with meaning between the lines flows when Fred and Renee 
speak with each other, always in a slow, stunted manner throughout the first 
30 minutes of the film.  Renee says that she's not going to watch Fred at the 
club tonight because she's "going to read".  "Read?" Fred says incredulously.  
He continues until she smirks and lets out an uncomfortable laugh.  "I'm glad 
to see I can still make you laugh," says Bill in a deadpan tone, "that's why 
I married you."  Bill's face seems to appear and disappear into darkness of 
his apartment through this portion of the film, offering some of the most 
impressive visual compositions seen in film for a very long time.  These 
shots are as low-contrast as one could possibly push the film stock, making 
images sink in and out of darkness, forcing the viewer to search the film's 
widescreen image in fear that there's something lurking just out of sight.  
These are by far the best scenes of the movie, ones that hearken back to 
Lynch's ERASERHEAD in style, and ones that truly unnerve.  It seems incredible
that Peter Deming, cinematographer of such straightforward, undemanding work 
as SON IN LAW or COSMIC SLOP, would be able to create such outstanding images, 
and leaves the filmgoer to wonder if Lynch didn't do most of the work on this 
portion of the film on his own.
One of the quintessential Lynch images is that of an electric light which, 
when it finds itself suddenly glowing too bright, burns out with a violent 
crack.  Similarly, Lynch will occasionally bathe his human or supernatural 
characters in a bright, almost blue light, to underline moments of the feeling 
of love, or warmth, or the desire thereof.  Henry Spencer, the main character 
of ERASERHEAD, finds himself fascinated by a "lady in the radiator", who seems 
to irradiate warmth and promise him that, in heaven, everything is fine -- 
and when at the end of the ERASERHEAD, he chastely embraces her, the screen 
is filled in that similarly white light.  However, when earlier in the film 
Henry makes love to a woman, he draws her into a pool illuminated similarly 
in white -- the glow disappears soon after which she realizes and is horrified 
with the situation Henry is in.  In LOST HIGHWAY's pivotal scene, Fred's 
doppelganger Pete is making love with Alice, bathed in the white light of the
headlights of their car.  "I want you," says Pete.  "You'll never have me," 
says Alice, and walks off, nude, into a shack.  The light from the headlights
fade, and we see Fred get up, walk into the shack, only to find the Mystery 
Man.  
Many have accused Lynch's view of sex as being adolescent.  In Lynch's films, 
however, when the characters crave love they turn to sex believing it to 
provide one in the same, and are disappointed and embittered when that is not 
the case.  In the story of LOST HIGHWAY, we see the young and virile Pete 
transform into Fred, the bitter and haunted artist, after having failed to 
find true love.  Is it too much to have Renee, a woman who draws them in with 
promises of what they desire and then leaves them empty and cold, to seem to 
have the devil as her doppelganger?  Maybe.  Maybe not.
What Lynch is doing, and what he has done in all of his best works, is to 
take a look at the dark side of life.  ERASERHEAD, exploring childbirth as a 
biological nightmare, took the most familiar event known to man and showed the 
dark side of it so completely and surrealistically, that most viewers were 
either confused or repulsed (or both) by a relatively simple and universal 
story of a young father.  In BLUE VELVET, Lynch examined the dark side that 
could exist in any community.  TWIN PEAKS literalized the concept of the 
doppelganger, as in the last episode, when the main character's soul is taken, 
literally splitting the character into good and evil apparitions.  Does this 
draw an easy line between good and evil?  Not so -- characters  who appear 
evil, such as TWIN PEAK's Windom Earle or LOST HIGHWAY's Dick Laurent are 
destroyed by Lynch's apparitions of the real forces of darkness ("Bob" in 
TWIN PEAKS, or LOST HIGHWAY's Mystery Man) as if to show that individuals who
try to emulate evil in the real world are nothing more than dangerous poseurs. 
In Lynch's films, the real evil stems from natural emotional and biological 
processes, so separated from the happy-faced whitewash that we as a society
tend to put on these events or feelings, that they are exaggerated to a 
surreal degree when discovered -- and that is precisely what makes Lynch's 
best moments genuinely frightening.  
In fashioning a story that relies on showing two sides of every character, 
Lynch and Gifford have plotted the film so that no character appears on 
screen with their doppelganger counterpart.  The story instead takes place as 
a cycle, where every action has a reaction in the film, but not necessarily 
after the event occurs in a linear fashion: an action can take place in the 
latter half of the film whose reaction appears in the first half.  Things that
seem needlessly surreal may in fact be a harbinger of developments to come -- 
in a movie like LOST HIGHWAY, where literal events go hand in hand with 
surrealistic representations, it's easy to confuse the two.  When the Mystery 
Man appears at the party and plays a trick with Fred's cell phone, is it 
really that the Mystery Man is both at the party and at Fred's house at the 
same time, or is the Mystery Man revealing that he is the doppelganger of 
Renee, who has been invited both to the party (by Andy, or Dick Laurent) but 
also to Fred's house?  When Fred goes back to his house, after the party, he 
leaves Renee outside, checking to see if there's a Mystery Man inside... "Of 
course there isn't," he ends up muttering.  He's right. 
The acting in Lost Highway is what ultimately spoils the fun.  None of the 
actors show much range, with Loggia's half-baked Frank Booth impression to 
Getty's and Pullman's brooding -- and all of the minor players give 
ridiculously artificial and deadpan performances.  Only Robert Blake as the 
Mystery Man strikes the perfect tone, and one wonders what this film would 
have been like had Lynch used actors of the caliber of his other work.  
Also problematic is the soundtrack.  Fluctuating between Lynch's grand 'sound 
design', where background noises add depth to the film along with overtones 
from the talented Angelo Badalamenti and the appropriate and energetic work of
Barry Adamson (whose faux-soundtrack albums have in the past shown his ability 
to create filmic moods through music alone) are mixed in with inappropriate 
songs from NIN and a ridiculously distracting cover of "This Magic Moment" by 
Lou Reed.  
LOST HIGHWAY is worth seeing for any of Lynch's fans, but will seem obtuse 
and overwrought to anyone not familiar with Lynch's work.  The film lags in 
its second half, and has its share of flaws from the standpoint of editing, 
music and acting.  What isn't problematic, however, is Lynch's vision, which 
is more clear and daring than it had been with his last feature films, WILD AT 
HEART and FIRE WALK WITH ME, films where Lynch's world view took a back seat 
to cheap thrills.  There's cheap thrills here, but there's a lot more for
the adventuresome filmgoer to discover, too.  
Signed: ESCHATFISCHE, david
(esch@fische.com) ----------------------------------------------------------

Author
Scott Renshaw
(October)
Starring:  Bill Pullman, Patricia Arquette, Balthazar Getty, Robert Blake,
Robert Loggia.
Screenplay:  David Lynch and Barry Gifford.
Producers:  Deepak Nayar, Tom Sternberg, Mary Sweeney.
Director:  David Lynch.
MPAA Rating:  R (sexual situations, nudity, violence, profanity)
Running Time:  134 minutes.
Reviewed by Scott Renshaw.
     Please don't bother asking me what LOST HIGHWAY is "about," because I
have only the vaguest idea.  I'm also not particularly bothered by that
fact, any more than I am bothered by not knowing what a Bosch painting or
a given chapter in "Ulysses" is "about."  A linear narrative is not a
pre-requisite for the evocation of an emotional response, and David Lynch
is one of the few artists who has tried to push the limits of cinema as a
medium of sound, images and possibilities.  That doesn't mean he always
knows when to stop pushing.  Somewhere between the fever dream of
ERASERHEAD and the ominous suburban dread of BLUE VELVET and the pilot of
"Twin Peaks" is a place where Lynch gets in trouble, where he begins to
irritate the audience he is trying to seduce.  LOST HIGHWAY is Lynch at
his best and his worst, as unnerving as it is excessive.
     Any attempt to describe the plot of LOST HIGHWAY is ultimately an
exercise in futility, but essentially it involves two uniquely connected
story-lines.  In the first, nightclub musician Fred Madison (Bill Pullman)
faces a couple of potentially threatening situations.  The jealous Fred is
worried that his wife Renee (a brunette Patricia Arquette) is cheating on
him, but even more worried when someone begins leaving videotapes on his
doorstep showing someone slowly stalking them.  Then, suddenly, Renee is
dead, and Fred is in prison on death row after being convicted of her
murder.  Then, even more suddenly, Fred has been replaced in his prison
cell by Pete Dayton (Balthazar Getty), a young mechanic with no memory of
how he got there.  When Pete is released, he ends up mixed up with a
gangster named Mr. Eddy (Robert Loggia), Mr. Eddy's mistress Alice
(Patricia Arquette again, now a blonde) and a spooky mystery man (Robert
Blake).
     There is little doubt in my mind that, when he is working at the top
of his form, David Lynch can turn our darkest unspoken fears into
brilliant cinema like no other living director.  There are nightmare
visions in Lynch projects which can leave you shaking for days, and there
are moments during the first hour of LOST HIGHWAY which build and release
tension with an almost unbearable skill.  Long stretches of silence are
punctuated by sudden bursts of sound; characters drift into darkness in
shots that linger long enough to make you start peeking through your
fingers.  And then there is the hilariously creepy scene where Blake's
white-faced Mystery Man taunts Fred by making a phone call to Fred's
house...which the Mystery Man himself then answers.  With its eerie
production design and slowly mounting paranoia, LOST HIGHWAY begins to
cast a spell which will have viewers anxious but intrigued.
     Too bad it takes such a short time to lose those viewers entirely.
The Fred-to-Pete transformation is not a fatal error in and of itself,
though audiences used to conventional narratives may be baffled by it.
The real villain in the collapse of LOST HIGHWAY is Lynch's inability to
ground the film so that its world makes internal sense.  ERASERHEAD's
landscape was unquestionably surreal; BLUE VELVET, as unsettling as it
was, always focused on the horrors of the real world.  Lynch's misfires,
like WILD AT HEART and the latter stages of "Twin Peaks," teased viewers
with real world horrors before launching into surreal realms which left
them throwing up their hands (if not actually throwing up).  The mistake
in LOST HIGHWAY isn't the outrageous character shift, but the way the
other characters in the film respond to that event as a problem to be
solved.  If LOST HIGHWAY is about psychosis made flesh, about
psychological duality becoming physical duality, it falls short of pulling
you into that world because it has given you the impression that there is
an "answer."  And while you're busy giving yourself a headache trying to
solve that mystery, you aren't getting caught up in the atmosphere of the
mystery itself.
     LOST HIGHWAY contains too many individual moments of vintage Lynch to
be considered a failure.  However, Lynch does seem to be repeating himself
as he tries to create those moments.  The grimly comic violence, the
degraded sexuality and the languid exchanges of dialogue are all familiar,
and seem more like self-plagiarism than a characteristic style.  Loggia's
gangster with the hair-trigger temper is a pale imitation of Dennis
Hopper's savage menace in BLUE VELVET, and Lynch's madonna/whore fixation
is in full bloom both in Arquette's sly dual role and Pete's girlfriend
Sheila (Natasha Gregson Wagner).  Lynch often seems more interested in
re-creating than creating, in taking the perfect 10's of his career and
cranking them up to 11.  For its first hour, LOST HIGHWAY is brilliant,
and there are flashes of that brilliance for another 75 minutes, but they
don't hold together because there isn't a consistent tone or structure to
sustain them.  In a film where everything seems to be in two places at
once, it is fitting that LOST HIGHWAY doesn't stay in any one place long
enough.

Author
Dennis Schwartz

LOST HIGHWAY (director/writer: David Lynch; screenwriter: Barry Gifford;
cinematographer: Peter Deming; editor: Mary Sweeney; cast: Bill Pullman
(Fred Madison), Patricia Arquette (Renee Madison/Alice Wakefield),
Robert Blake (Mystery Man), Balthazar Getty (Pete Dayton), Robert Loggia
(Mr. Eddy/Dick Laurent), Michael Massee (Andy), Natasha Gregson Wagner
(Sheila), Marilyn Manson (Porno Star No. 1), Gary Busey (Bill Dayton),
Lucy Butler (Candace Dayton), Richard Pryor (Garage Owner); Runtime:
135; October Films; 1997)
David Lynch's Lost Highway, his first feature film after five years, is
a surreal thriller with a puzzling plot, that asks a lot from the
viewer, as far as accepting this far-fetched tale on face value. It's
meant to be a non-conventional film, a shocker, an attempt at
post-modern noir, an avant-garde sci-fi ghost story that is stylish and
engrossing, but what it mostly is, is a confusing film that tries to be
weirder than his Eraserhead and Blue Velvet films, but is too outlandish
to be compared with those superior features. It also smacks of being
pretentious, of putting down the characters in nonhuman terms, as if
they are so unimportant that they can easily be reincarnated to appear
as someone else, without any explanation being given. It was a cold
story, seemingly with psychological undertones about
multiple-personality disorders that stretches logic to the breaking
point. But it held my attention throughout and concludes with a
roller-coast ride down a dark, desolate highway, with an ending that
does little to give meaning to the puzzle. But it does complete its
narrative by tieing up the loose ends of what the characters were
plotting and it keeps intact its pessimistic mood.
Fred Madison (Pullman) is a jazz saxophone player living in an
ultra-modern posh house in the Hollywood Hills section of L.A., who is
distraught because he suspects his sexy brunette wife Renee (Patricia
Arquette) of cheating. A videocassette is left on their doorstep showing
that their house is being observed. The next day another tape is found
on the doorstep, it reveals the couple sleeping in their bedroom, which
prompts them to call the cops to investigate. Fred, also, at this time,
suffers from a series of nightmares in which he sees a mysterious,
pasty-faced man (Blake). Coincidentally, at a party given by Andy, a
friend of his wife's, he sees the same mystery man he saw in his dream.
Strangely, this mystery man knows he was in Fred's dream. A third
videocassette arrives, this one shows the results of a grisly murder, as
Renee is bludgeoned to death and Fred, the presumably innocent victim
has no memory of her slaying and doesn't believe he did it, yet is
nevertheless convicted of first degree murder. And before you realize
what's happening, Fred is in an isolated cell on Death Row awaiting to
be juiced to death.
While in his cell, Fred unexplainably changes into a younger man, a
garage mechanic named Pete (Balthazar Getty). Pete winds up in Fred's
cell with a gash on his puss. Fred just vanishes for the time being. The
captain of the prison exclaims, when he sees what happened, "This is
some spooky shit we got here." It sounded like this is something that
could have been said in an adult version of an 'Amos and Andy' sketch.
Pete when released from prison goes home to his supportive parents and
punky girlfriend Sheila, and returns to his auto mechanic job. Mr. Eddy
(Loggia), a ruthless gangster, admires the way Pete fixes his cars. On
one of those car visits, he is accompanied by someone who could be Renee
(still Arquette) but with blonde hair and who now goes by the name
Alice. She is his mistress, and he is quite willing to kill anyone who
makes a play for her.
Alice entices Pete to begin this dangerous affair with her, and when she
fears Mr.Eddy is getting wise to them, she talks him into doing a
robbery in the desert and running away with her.
Lynch then goes into exploiting his usual themes of violence, gore and
dubious sexual situations and we also get to see Arquette stroll around
in her underwear, when she's not completely nude. She was the least
interesting of all the characters, partly because of her insipid
performance and partly because the two characters she played were not
particularly interesting.
Robert Blake, as an androgynous creep, is mysteriously portrayed as some
sort of specter, who could be Renee and Alice in another form. Even
Loggia has two identities and names, Mr. Eddy and Dick Laurent. I'm not
exactly clear what it means, but a lot of things in this film serve as
doubles, including the couple's house which is a double for the Lost
Highway Hotel, where some heavy-duty action takes place in the film's
concluding moments.
Both Bill Pullman and Balthazar Getty are effective in their roles, as
they both seem to be acting in a low-key mode. While the Loggia role was
too predictably gangsterish and seen too often in recent films to bring
much to the table here (it was second-rate in maniacal comic-viciousness
compared to Hopper's same type of role in Blue Velvet). The movie was
somewhat effective not because of the actors or the story, but because
it was elusive, atmospheric, unpredictable, different in form, and
gracefully ethereal. It was a film that took chances, resulting in an
uneven work, but in its dark moments was able to shine as a haunting
film. If one wishes to make sense of this film, it would have to be done
on a metaphorical level, and it would take dismissing logic and loving a
film that relishes in its darkness and obscurity.
Dennis Schwartz: "Ozus' World Movie Reviews"
Š ALL RIGHTS RESERVED   DENNIS SCHWARTZ

Author
Ted Prigge
Director: David Lynch
Writers: David Lynch and Barry Gifford
Starring: Bill Pullman, Patricia Arquette, Bathalzar Getty, Robert
Loggia, Robert Blake, Gary Busey, Richard Pryor, Giovanni Ribissi, Henry
Rollins, Marilyn Manson, Jack Nance
David Lynch is one of the more...interesting directors.  He's made a
career out of baffling people with his films that to call bizarre is
merely an understatement.  But in most of his great films, there's some
kind of underlying theme or message.  Take "Eraserhead" - a film that on
the surface makes about as much sense as William S. Borroughs' "Naked
Lunch."  But one can see a satirical vein inside, popping out.  But his
newest film, meant to be his comeback after "Twin Peaks: Fire Walk With
Me," not to mention the whole "Twin Peaks" spiel (which i kind of
liked), is, to paraphrase Shakespeare, a film of sound and fury,
signifying noting.
Get this for a premise: a saxophonist (Bill Pullman) and his brunette
wife (Patricia Arquette) live in a spacious condo of sorts in, I think,
L.A. or somewhere.  They mysteriously begin receiving packages with
tapes in them that show their house, first from the outside, then from
the inside, showing them sleeping.  They freak, call the cops, and then
one night, get a tape that only Bill watches, and sees Arquette brutally
murdered.  Of course, he did it, but he has no recolection of actually
killing her...or any kind of motive.
He's sent to jail, and begins getting massive headaches all of a
sudden.  One day, one of the guards look in and see he has mutated into
a whole other person!  Instead of the moody saxophonist, he's now a punk
90s teenager (Bathalzar Getty).  They let him out, 'cause they really
can't hold him since he's a whole other person, and he goes back to his
life, but things have kind of changed for the more bizarre.
Not only does his one female friend begin taking off her shirt for him,
but back at his mechanic job (run by Richard Pryor, who seems to so sick
that it almost brought a tear to my eye), he meets the moll (Arquette
again, this time as a blond) of a short-tempered mafia guy (Robert
Loggia).  They obviously begin spending nights at cheap motels, but
Loggia obviously and eventually finds out.  Then I got lost as far as
plotting, as they have sex in the middle of the road, he turns back into
Bill Pullman, there's a porn starring Marilyn Manson.  Oi.
First off, I believe that not all films are supposed to be taken as
literally as others.  I'm very apt to letting plot details slide, like
in the case of a John Woo film.  It brings the film experience down, and
it makes me feel anal.  And when watching David Lynch films, I try not
to be hypercritical about the plot, since he usually has some kind of
theme, as I said.
"Lost Highway" has not theme.  It's about nothing.  It's just a weird
film with a neat gimmick of switching the protagonists, not like Woo's
"Face/Off," where the two who switched had a rivalry going on, but that
the two have never even met eachother and have no link whatsoever.  What
is this supposed to mean?  Why did these two switch?  And then there's
the Arquette thing.  Why are there two of her?  Is it the same person? 
These are questions I don't think Lynch even knows.  But the thing is, I
would excuse these and give this a good rating if, and only if, it meant
someting.  If it was out to prove something satirical, or give some sort
of message to the audience, I would forgo this the same way I forgo the
fact that in the end of "A Clockwork Orange," there are just too many
coincidences.  That was a fable though.  This is just a David Lynch
film.
Then there's the one scene that baffled me so much that my head hurt -
the one where Robert Blake (from "In Cold Blood") walks into the room at
the party with his face painted white, his ears sticking out, and
dressed in some weird garb, walks up to Pullman, and tells him he's at
his house at the same time he's talking to him at the party.  Pullman
obviously doesn't believe him, so Blake gives him a cell phone and tells
him to dial up his number.  He does, and Blake picks up on the other
end, even though he's standing in front of him.  Now this is ingenious. 
I mean, I heard about this scene months before it came out, and I was
telling everybody about it.  But what does it mean?  Is he some sort of
God who can control time or something?  Did he kill Arquette?  And why
did Pullman and Getty switch places?  And where did Pullman go when they
switched?
Also, Lynch seems to be recylcing ideas from his older films.  The
Loggia character is just an older version of the Dennis Hopper character
in "Blue Velvet."  The scene where Arquette is forced to strip at
gunpoint is faintly reminiscent of the scene in "Blue Velvet" where
Isabella Rossellini was dropped off by the mob guys totally naked and in
suburbia (my nightmare).  The god-like ability for Blake to be two
places at once..."DUNE!"  And Arquette being a brunette, then a blond -
well, that's a rip off of Hitchcock's "Vertigo."  I sure hope this guy
hasn't run out of ideas.
I like Lynch, mainly because he's intellectual stimulating.  But what I
hate about this film is it's SO SLOW MOVING.  It moves about an inch per
hour, mainly attributed to the incredibly long pauses between the
characters' lines.  They speak in hushed tones, and then go ahead and
take seconds to respond.  "Are you going to read?" (insert 14 seconds
here) "Yes." (insert 16 seconds here) "Read.  Ha.  Read."  The actors
don't really act much in the first half, mainly because their lines are
mechanical.  Pullman and Arquette can act and all, but you wouldn't know
it here.
But to be postitive about this film, I think it's not as bad as it
seems.  Yes, it makes absolutely no sense.  No, it doesn't have any kind
of purpose for being.  However.  It's fascinating to watch.  With the
neat gimmick of it not having any kind of purpose, Lynch grasps the
audience in his claw, garnering their attention span for the whole
time.  Yes, it's frequently boring, but never dull (it makes sense to
me).  And there are some classic scenes.  For one, the Blake party/phone
call scene is too cool for words.  And there's this great plug for not
tailgating, done with Robert Loggia.  And, I mean, you get to see Gary
Busey subdued!
There's not much more I can say about this film.  It's totally void of
any meaning, but it's one hell of a watch.
P.S. Look for "Eraserhead" himself, Jack Nance, in his final role as a
kinda senile mechanic.
Homepage at: http://www.geocities.com/Hollywood/Hills/8335/

Author
Nick Schaden
        David Lynch's movies have always been an eccentric, bizarre take upon
life and society.   Ever since Lynch's masterpiece, "Blue Velvet" came
out in 1986, Lynch's pictures dropped in quality dramatically, with both
"Wild At Heart" and "Fire Walk With Me" being below average pictures.  
Luckily, David Lynch has bounced back with a great mystery/noir film,
"Lost Highway".
        I won't dig deep into the plot of this movie, because frankly, I'm
still having trouble piecing the whole thing together.   The movie
starts with a married couple Fred (Bill Pullman) and Renee (Patricia
Arquette).   The couple get a series of videos, and then BANG, we're
suddenly getting into metamorphosis, mirror images, double lives, time
going backward and forward.   By the end of the movie, I was left with
plenty of unanswered questions, and while the plot line seems to ravel
together in a bizarre, "Vertigo"-like fashion, the knot is not even
close to fully tied by the end of the movie.
        As is a trademark characteristic of Lynch's films,  the movie is
breathtaking, with amazing visual and audio art, which pulled me into
the movie.   The movie is original, fresh, and incredibly scary and
disturbing.  I'm usually not the kind of person that gets spooked, but
"Lost Highway"'s visuals, and  sounds (especially in the first third of
the movie) were absolutely haunting to me.
        The cinematography by Peter Deming pushes the limits of this film's
motif.   Not only are certain scenes dark but people appear to vanish
and suddenly appear out of the darkness as though they materialized from
thin air. In certain first person perspective camera angles, the camera
jars, blurs, and shakes, as though the audience is on some strange
hallucinogen. It's unbelievable.
        "Lost Highway" has to be taken at it's full visual and artistic impact,
the movie isn't made to be fully comprehensible.   Other critics have
blasted the movie, blowing off the bizarre plot.   However, to truly
enjoy this movie, you can't expect warm, fuzzy and wrapped up endings as
in most mainstream movies, as Lynch refuses to provide answers for any
of the many mysteries deep in "Lost Highway"'s plot.   We may get clues,
but no answers. To me, this bizarre approach worked, I was fascinated by
the plot, and still many days afterward I'm still trying to piece this
movie together in some sensible fashion.   On that same note, it's my
belief that some of the audience will be more frustrated by the plot
than satisfied.   If it weren't for that large percentage of viewers,
I'd probably give this movie a +4.   Thus I warn fans of definite and
linear plot lines (i.e. people who hate movies like "Pulp Fiction",
"Reservoir Dogs" because non-linear plot) that you may be disappointed. 
However, for the rest of you, "Lost Highway" is a captivating and
wonderful movie, Lynch's best since "Blue Velvet".

Author
Serdar Yegulalp
Less than a full day after posting my review of David Lynch's LOST HIGHWAY,
I got a flood of mail from people who insisted I was deluded, mistaken, a
snob, or some combination of those three. Since I've never gotten such a
violent reaction from any other review I posted, I decided I owed a more
detailed and public explanation of my stance.
I've grown to dislike David Lynch's movies. I didn't initially; I found
ERASERHEAD, THE ELEPHANT MAN and even BLUE VELVET interesting and unique.
After that he's grown hopelessly self-conscious and self-important, but
those are not the worst of his problems as a director. Because my primary
reaction to his movies is emotional, I need to sit down and take apart the
reasons *why* I think he provokes these reactions in me.
First, I have grown tired of the way he takes potentially interesting
material and then smothers it with his "style" -- really just a strategy, a
way of taking the edge off ugly material by calling it all a big pop-culture
joke. This is not the same as satire of the DR. STRANGELOVE variety. There,
we have at least a sense of WHY we should feel contempt for a given figure.
Lynch's approach is like pointing and laughing, and inviting for us to do so
when we really don't want to. The noxious opening scene in WILD AT HEART is
a good example of this. Lynch gives us Nicholas Cage beating a black man to
death, but instead of trying to deal with the consequences of including such
a stomach-turning scene of violence in his movie, he laughs it off. Roger
Ebert felt the same way about BLUE VELVET, and while I disagree with his
take on that particular movie, I agree with his comment at large: "I didn't
need the director prancing on every ten minutes in top hat and tails,
whispering that it was all in fun."
I'm also tired of being told that the symbolism in Lynch's movies are the
key to understanding them. Symbolism is private. Your interpretation of the
name "Henry Long" might differ totally from mine. Because of that, it's no
accident that the movies which have their symbolism debated the most
fiercely are the ones which already tell an engaging and absorbing story:
because we've already had our interested enlisted on one level, we can then
move to dissect what the director really "meant" by this line of dialogue or
that image.
A movie that isn't interesting from the beginning, that has "symbolism"
forcibly injected into it -- in the same way that many dull Hollywood
comedies are pepped up by the gratuitous inclusion of a car crash or a man
getting kicked in the groin -- is hardly worth taking apart. It's like the
boy who cut his drum open to see what made it go bang. If Lynch sits there
with long lists of carefully-mapped symbolisms to write into his movies,
he's kind of missing the point.
As far as non-linear technique, or just technique in general, I keep
thinking of CITIZEN KANE. That movie was non-linear and experimental, but
told a strong and absorbing story BECAUSE of those things instead of IN
SPITE of them. The technique served the story. In LOST HIGHWAY, the
technique doesn't evolve out of the material, but is slapped on top of it as
a way of jazzing it up.
There's one line which was pointed out to me as being a "key" to the movie:
Fred Madison's statement, "I like to remember things my own way." This is
presumably supposed to be a sign that the whole movie's disjointedness is
because it is the rememberances of a dissasociative mind. Fine, but if
they'd actually written a movie ABOUT that, instead of just CONTAINING it,
it would probably have been watchable. As it stands, it just uses that as a
showcase for Lynch's various obsessions, which aren't interesting because
they aren't hooked into anything.
Other people have argued that Lynch's movies are not really about plot, but
emotions. Fine. Scott Renshaw, another rec.arts.movies.reviews regular whose
writings I respect, had this to say in his review: "A linear narrative is
not a pre-requisite for the evocation of an emotional response." Maybe not,
but it's a good way to insure that the odds of *spurious* emotional
responses are cut down. If *all* Lynch wanted out of me was an emotional
response, that's fine, because I had one: Boredom. It's not that his movies
don't make any sense or are "weird", it's that I can see all too clearly why
they're like that. They're part of a strategy to help him deflect criticism
of a story which at its core has not been given any real thought.
I am not a person who demands that every movie follow the mapped-out
genre-dictated requirements of every movie before it. I do not walk into a
theater expecting to have my hand held and my ego stroked. I admire
experimentation in the movies. I *liked* ERASERHEAD and BLUE VELVET, but
those seemed to have been made before Lynch became hyper-conscious of what
he was doing and started to one-up his audience.
Art critic and historian Jacques Barzun once said that one of the
prerequisites of labeling anything an experiment is the willingness to
concede that the experiment may be a failure. I like the fact that Lynch is
trying to do something different, but I can't pretend to enjoy the results.

Author
James Brundage
Did you ever feel, if only for a second, that your entire world was
redefined? Everything changes in one instant and, although the change may be
gone in the next, you are never the same. For that instant, in the complete
weirdness of the moment, you feel your entire world collapse as everything
is questioned. Truth, lies, God, life, death, reality (with Lynch,
especially reality). Your entire world doesn't feel right even if it is.
That's what Lost Highway does to you, gives you that queasy feeling in your
stomach, instantly altering everything we ever knew and ever suspected.
Nothing is true, and nothing is false. Reality means nothing. Who you are
means  nothing.
This is a conclusion that, along with other things, took me watching it four
times to realize.
Does is sound utterly and irrevocably insane to you? Well, it is. Without a
single doubt, the weirdest of the upwards of a thousand movies that I have
seen (of course I'm still trying to find where in the hell I can rent
Eraserhead).
The story is as complex (if not more) than I've made it out to be. It begins
in a small room, with a tenor sax (Fred, played by Bill Pullman), smoking on
a cigarette when his buzzer rings. He presses it and someone tells him "Dick
Laurant is Dead"
Things get weirder. His wife is cheating on him, there is a man looking like
a vampire able to be in two places at once, and time has absolutely no
meaning. Don't make the mistake of thinking this is some sci-fi movie,
either. It fits the bill of a rarity, something that only one person has
pulled off more than once (David Lynch being that one person), a Nightmare
World movie. The weirdest and most interesting type of movie because they go
where others never will. I'd tell you more, but this one's so screwed up
that you'll have to see it on your own. A forewarning, though, the movie has
about as much profanity as JFK, as much sex as Showgirls, and as much
violence as Platoon.

Author
Steve Rhodes
     Few directors have such a unique, some would say bizarre, style
as David Lynch.  He received Academy Award nominations for THE ELEPHANT
MAN and BLUE VELVET, but other pictures of his, such as DUNE and WILD
AT HEART, have been panned by many.  His latest, LOST HIGHWAY, is his
most unorthodox film yet, but one of his better ones.
     The press kit describes the movie as a "psychogenic fugue" and a
"Moebius strip" with elements of Lewis Carroll and Franz Kafka.  Yes,
it is all of those and more.
     LOST HIGHWAY blends film noir with the tension of a horror movie.
The power comes from the director's use of silence.  Characters are
genuinely frightened by what is happening to them because they cannot
figure it out.  They react with stunned silence.  (As you read this
review you may be inclined to conclude that you have no interest in
seeing the movie, but the film works more effectively than any possible
verbal description of it might lead you to believe.)
     When Renee Madison (Patricia Arquette) comes into the house with
an unmarked envelope she found on her front steps, her husband Fred
(Bill Pullman) inquires, "What's that?"  After a long pause, she
answers, "a videotape."  Another pregnant pause, and then he asks,
"Who's it from."  She ponders for a while and then tells him, "I don't
know."  When they play the tape, its abstruse message is a two second
video clip of the front of their house followed by the loud hiss of
blank tape.
     The sound effects editing and the music enhance the heavy tension.
At first, the film has complete silence interspersed with dialog -- no
background ambient noise at all.  Slowly, low natural background sounds
are introduced and then this gives way to music consisting of long, low
rumbling notes designed to frighten.
     I see so many films that I get somewhat desensitized, but the
first part of this movie managed to scare me badly with devices as
natural as the sudden, loud ringing of a phone.  An intense and very
disturbing film in the beginning.  When the parameters of the mystery
are revealed, the tension stays, but the film becomes much less
disquieting.
     I am not going to cover any of the film's details.  I will just
set up the first few minutes of the film.  Suffice it to say that the
film involves character transformation, reincarnation, surreal dreams,
and more.
     To give a feel of what is in store for the viewers, consider
another early scene.  Fred meets an inexplicable "Mystery Man," played
by Robert Blake, at a party at someone else's home.  "I'm at your house
right now," the man tells Fred.  Handing Fred a cell phone, he
challenges him to, "Call me."
     The script by Barry Gifford and David Lynch perplexes the viewers
with all of the false views and disconcerting realities of an Escher
print.  An omnipresent, but an identifiable fear dominates the
picture's landscape.
     Some of the vignettes in the film are priceless.  My favorite
could become an educational video for traffic schools.  After viewing
how a gangster known as Mr. Eddy (Robert Loggia) treats tailgaters,
drivers will never dare follow too closely again.
     The cinematography by Peter Deming pushes the limits of the film
noir motif.  Not only are scenes dark but some characters walk into
the darkness and disappear as if into an astronomical black hole.
The costumes and sets, both by Patricia Norris, portray a world of
stark black and white images which, of course, make the red blood all
the more dramatic by contrast.
     I was caught up in LOST HIGHWAY's labyrinth.  You can think of
the show as a film constructed with non-Euclidean geometry.  I still
don't understand it, but the movie is not made to be comprehensible.
What is less satisfying is the way characters caught in a deadly web
such as this never seek advice on what is happening to them.  The
closest they come in LOST HIGHWAY is seen when mechanic Pete Dayton
(Balthazar Getty) laments, "Why me?"  The answers to this and all of
the film's conundrums are in the final analysis, unknowable.
     LOST HIGHWAY runs needlessly long at 2:15.  It is rated R for
graphic violence, sex, nudity, and profanity.  Teenagers should be
mature if they go.  I was fascinated by this long enigma so I
recommend it to you and give it ***.
Opinions expressed are mine and not meant to reflect my employer's.

Author
James Berardinelli
Cast: Bill Pullman, Patricia Arquette, Balthazar Getty, Robert Blake, 
      Robert Loggia, Gary Busey, Lucy Butler, Natasha Gregson Wagner, 
      Jack Nance
Director: David Lynch
Producers: Deepak Nayar, Tom Sternberg, Mary Sweeney
Screenplay: David Lynch and Barry Gifford
Cinematography: Peter Deming
Music: Angelo Badalamenti
U.S. Distributor: October Films
     Perhaps it's redundant to say that a David Lynch movie is weird 
(actually, "incomprehensible" might be a better word).  Don't ask me to 
explain LOST HIGHWAY; I'm not sure I can.  For that matter, don't ask 
Lynch, either.  All he's willing to say is that it's "a 21st century 
noir horror film" and it's up to viewers to draw their own conclusions.  
LOST HIGHWAY is unusually bizarre even for this atypical director.  Co-
written by Barry Gifford, the film ventures deeper into the nearly 
psychotic supernatural than any feature Lynch has previous overseen.  
And, while not approaching the brilliant level attained by BLUE VELVET, 
LOST HIGHWAY is an improvement over the film maker's most recent two 
outings, WILD AT HEART (based on the novel by Gifford) and TWIN PEAKS: 
FIRE WALK WITH ME.
     Compelling, creepy, pretentious, self-indulgent, frustrating -- all 
of these apply to LOST HIGHWAY.  At times, this film seems like the 
effort of an exceptionally talented artist.  On other occasions, it's 
more like the product of a hack.  Lynch borrows heavily from his own 
past work without breaking much new ground.  LOST HIGHWAY's unevenness 
is maddening.  As for what's going on -- I'm not sure even Lynch knows 
what it all means.  As far as I can tell, LOST HIGHWAY is a highly 
atmospheric horror/thriller that involves spontaneous, uncontrolled time 
travel, body snatching, and ghostly apparitions.  Mostly, it's about the 
malleability of identity, and, as such, takes a few cues from 
Hitchcock's VERTIGO.
     LOST HIGHWAY opens by introducing us to Fred Madison (Bill 
Pullman), an affluent jazz musician with an upscale home and a gorgeous 
wife, Renee (Patricia Arquette).  But all is not well in this paradise.  
Fred and Renee are having trouble communicating and he's suspicious that 
she's having an affair.  One morning, an unmarked videotape is left on 
the Madisons' doorstep.  All it shows is a quick clip of the outside of 
the house.  The next morning, there's another tape.  This one is more 
sinister.  Apparently shot from within the bedroom, it shows Fred and 
Renee peacefully asleep.  Shortly thereafter, following a strange, 
dreamlike episode in which Fred wanders around in a dark nether-
dimension, another tape arrives.  This one depicts Fred murdering Renee.
     Had the story remained fixed on this foundation, LOST HIGHWAY might 
have been a great film.  Instead, it wanders off in another direction, 
so, while the beginning and end are strong, the middle hour, which 
seemingly has little to do with anything that went before it, is slow 
and meandering.  The lead character for this segment, grungy auto 
mechanic Pete Dayton (Balthazar Getty) isn't as interesting as Fred.  
Plus, during this entire extended tangent, we're wondering how (or if) 
this is going to tie in with the more harrowing material that preceded 
it.
     Questions of identity are central to LOST HIGHWAY.  Are the male 
leads, played by different actors, actually the same character?  Are the 
female leads, played by one actress, really different people?  And how 
can one man be in two places at the same time, holding a phone 
conversation with himself?  Of course, if you actually expect answers to 
any of these questions, you've made a mistake by looking for them in a 
Lynch film.
     Patricia Arquette has developed into an actress with impressive 
range.  She can play the female lead in a sweet romance (INFINITY), a 
wacky comedy (FLIRTING WITH DISASTER), or a bloody crime movie (TRUE 
ROMANCE).  Here, her performance is modeled after the famous femme 
fatales of Hollywood's classic noir B-movies (albeit with a few 
"Lynchian" quirks).  She plays two roles in LOST HIGHWAY (one blond and 
one brunette), and, in each of them, she's sexy, sultry, and shows a lot 
of skin.
     Bill Pullman, who normally plays Mr. Nice Guy, is a solid choice 
for LOST HIGHWAY's most prominent role.  Pullman's image works for the 
character, because we naturally want to like him even if we shouldn't.  
As Pete, the "second lead", Balthazar Getty (WHITE SQUALL) is 
significantly weaker.  There's nothing interesting about his 
performance, which gets lost in a sea of more impressive, less prominent 
turns.  Two of the supporting actors are Robert Blake, who is suitably 
eerie as the Grim Reaper-like Mystery Man, and an over-the-top Robert 
Loggia, who portrays a tough gangster.
     From a technical perspective, LOST HIGHWAY demands to be noticed.  
The juiced-up soundtrack keeps the audience in the movie (one time, a 
telephone ring was so loud and unexpected that I nearly jumped out of my 
seat).  Some of the camerawork, with its distorted visuals and 
unconventional angles, seems showy and gratuitous, although there are 
times (such as the grainy, black-and-white videotape images) when it's 
effective.
     When it comes to rating LOST HIGHWAY, the numerical scale seems 
inadequate.  Some viewers will walk out of this film in disgust; others 
will praise it as a brilliant breath of fresh air.  Such is always the 
polarization over Lynch's work.  Personally, I kind of liked LOST 
HIGHWAY, but "liking" a David Lynch movie is much different from 
"liking" anything else.  So, the bottom line is, if you're a Lynch fan 
or an aficionado of bizarre, offbeat cinema, give LOST HIGHWAY a shot.  
Everyone else will probably best be served by staying away.
- James Berardinelli
e-mail: berardin@bc.cybernex.net
ReelViews web site: http://www.cybernex.net/~berardin 

Author
Joshua McAdams
        Mere words cannot begin to describe the experience of David
Lynch's "Lost Highway."  To label the film as egotistical ,
nonsensical, and amateurish would be an insult to films I have
previously considered as bottomfeeders. 
        Lynch mistakes begin in the opening credits when he attempts
to blend  David Bowie (imitating Billy Coriggan) crooning over a erratic POV shot speeding down a deserted highway at night. This incredibly blatant grab for the "alternative", or art house,  box office  totally unmasks Lynch the "artist" to reveal a director who I can only describe as comically untalented. But at least he knows his target audience. 
        More examples of Lynch's overt attempt to be "different"
abound as the story starts to progress. Bill Pullman is a saxophonist
with a cheating wife who starts finding videotapes on his front stoop
from an anonymous evil entity. See how long it took to describe the
action? Lynch doesn't see it as this straight forward. Instead he
milks every minute detail of the couples' strained relationship,
pausing for endless amounts of dead time and filtering in "eerie"
music to manipulate the audience. Granted, soundtracks always toy with
the audiences emotions but "Lost Highway" is so contrived that you
feel used instead of apprehensive. 
        Lynch shakes the camera, which some will no doubt laud as
great direction. Lynch puts people wearing black shirts against black
backgrounds, which some people may see as symbolic. The man treats his
narrative like a disobedient child; taking the story away from the
audience for a couple of minutes, beating the hell out of it and
bringing it back when it starts to behave like he thinks it should.
But what Lynch does most of all is waste time and film. "Lost Highway"
drags  into a world of  "surrealism" until it finally begins to twist
and constrict
around itself, choking all promise and life from the offering. Why is
the publicity surrounding his films always about Lynch himself?
Three words: lack of  plot.
        To further disguise the idea abyss, Lynch brings in these
graphic sex scenes, six or seven in all, that I suppose could be
justified as central to characters. Instead I found myself asking why
I was looking  at Patricia Arquette's breasts again.  "Lost
Highway" sets itself in a category that has been reserved for the
absolute worst of the worst. Yes, it  constantly  breaks new ground:
and fall straight into the basement.
        Fortunately there are some individuals who 
enjoy this type of film making. I find them  gathered in art galleries
and coffee shops discussing the meaning of this or the theme of that.
I always attempt to get some type of concrete examples as to why they
feel Lynch is a quality director, but all I tend to get is artiste
doublespeak such as "Lynch explores repressed tensions of the world."
It's a sad statement about our commercial society when something is
considered artistic just because it is different or because someone
(usually the person who does it) tells you how different and artistic
the work is.
        But what are these rambling sentences but word? To truly
appreciate  this artist with no art, Lost Highway is a must see.   
Rating: Class Four Buzzkill: Go alone or you will end up apologizing.

Author
Chuck Dowling
Lost Highway (1996) *1/2 out of ***** - Cast: Bill Pullman, Patricia
Arquette, Balthazar Getty, Robert Blake, Gary Busey, Robert Loggia, Jack
Nance, Henry Rollins. Written by: David Lynch and Barry Gifford. Directed
by: David Lynch. Running Time: 135 minutes.
In just about every review I've read for director David Lynch's latest
self-indulgent nonsense, no matter if the review is positive or negative,
the main point is clear. The reviewer cannot explain what the movie is
about. Well, neither can I. I won't even try to give any sort of synopsis of
this film. It just can't be done. And I'm sorry, if I watch something that
makes absolutely no sense whatsoever (and ultimately isn't MEANT to make any
sense), I do not enjoy it and therefore cannot give it a favorable review.
Surprisingly, despite my dislike of Lynch, the first part of the film is
greatly entertaining. First off, the opening credit sequence, as simple as
it is, gets me in the mood for a good movie. I can't explain why, I just
really like everything about the film's opening credits. Then "Lost Highway"
is almost a normal film (for Lynch anyway), becoming very intriguing as it
proceeds along. I was extremely interested in the situations being presented
and the direction of the story.
But unfortunately, I know how Lynch's mind works. And so the story
progresses along for about an hour to a plot twist, which then ruins the
entire movie. It must have killed the man to do anything during his
outstanding TV series "Twin Peaks" which satisfied the audience. Now, as it
seems, he takes great pleasure in telling the audience to screw off, because
he's going to make a movie for himself and no one else. So when the closing
credits roll and we realize that we understand even less of what's going on
than we did ten minutes earlier, I can just hear Lynch squealing with
delight at the joke he's just played on the audience. Hey, I've got a joke
for you David, it's called pathetic box office returns and another five
years before someone finances another one of your "films". Enjoy that one.
The cast is fine with what they have, but Lynch has no ear for dialogue. As
with most of his work, conversations take forever, as characters pause
forever before responding. Entertainment Weekly said that Arquette "acts
with her breasts" in the film, and it's true. That's all Lynch gives her to
do. I'm not saying that's bad, I'm just saying...
On a "Twin Peaks" sidenote: Eric DaRe, who played Leo Johnson (a major
character) on the show, is listed in the closing credits as a member of the
crew. A grip or a best boy or something like that. And Jack Nance, who
played Pete on "Twin Peaks" and who passed away recently plays a mechanic in
the film. I believe this was his last role. [R]
Visit Chuck's Movie Reviews at http://users.southeast.net/~chuckd21/
Over 1,600 movies rated and/or reviewed!  Movie news, film related links, and reader's reviews.
